Utah statutes.
17-33-10.   Grievance and appeals procedure -- Employees' complaints of discriminatory employment practice.

(1)  Any county to which the provisions of this act apply shall establish in its personnel rules and regulations a grievance and appeals procedure.  The procedure shall be used to resolve disputes arising from grievances as defined in the rules and regulations, including acts of discrimination.  The procedure may also be used by employees in the event of dismissal, demotion, suspension, or transfer.

(2)  Any charge by a county career service employee of discriminatory or prohibited employment practice as prohibited by Section 34A-5-106, can be filed with the Division of Antidiscrimination and Labor within the Labor Commission.  Complaints shall be filed within 30 days of the issuance of a written decision of the county career service council.

